Maryland, session 2025, SB0336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
7–104.
(a) A person may not willfully or knowingly obtain or exert unauthorized control
over property, if the person:
(1) intends to deprive the owner of the property;
(2) willfully or knowingly uses, conceals, or abandons the property in a
manner that deprives the owner of the property; or
(3) uses, conceals, or abandons the property knowing the use, concealment,
or abandonment probably will deprive the owner of the property.
(b) A person may not obtain control over property by willfully or knowingly using
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0336*

SENATE BILL 336
deception, if the person:
(1) intends to deprive the owner of the property;
(2) willfully or knowingly uses, conceals, or abandons the property in a
manner that deprives the owner of the property; or
(3) uses, conceals, or abandons the property knowing the use, concealment,
or abandonment probably will deprive the owner of the property.
(c) (1) A person may not possess stolen personal property knowing that it has
been stolen, or believing that it probably has been stolen, if the person:
(i) intends to deprive the owner of the property;
(ii) willfully or knowingly uses, conceals, or abandons the property
in a manner that deprives the owner of the property; or
(iii) uses, conceals, or abandons the property knowing that the use,
concealment, or abandonment probably will deprive the owner of the property.
(2) In the case of a person in the business of buying or selling goods, the
knowledge required under this subsection may be inferred if:
(i) the person possesses or exerts control over property stolen from
more than one person on separate occasions;
(ii) during the year preceding the criminal possession charged, the
person has acquired stolen property in a separate transaction; or
(iii) being in the business of buying or selling property of the sort
possessed, the person acquired it for a consideration that the person knew was far below a
reasonable value.
(3) In a prosecution for theft by possession of stolen property under this
subsection, it is not a defense that:
(i) the person who stole the property has not been convicted,
apprehended, or identified;
(ii) the defendant stole or participated in the stealing of the property;
(iii) the property was provided by law enforcement as part of an
investigation, if the property was described to the defendant as being obtained through the
commission of theft; or
(iv) the stealing of the property did not occur in the State.

SENATE BILL 336 3
(4) Unless the person who criminally possesses stolen property
participated in the stealing, the person who criminally possesses stolen property and a
person who has stolen the property are not accomplices in theft for the purpose of any rule
of evidence requiring corroboration of the testimony of an accomplice.
(d) A person may not obtain control over property knowing that the property was
lost, mislaid, or was delivered under a mistake as to the identity of the recipient or nature
or amount of the property, if the person:
(1) knows or learns the identity of the owner or knows, is aware of, or
learns of a reasonable method of identifying the owner;
(2) fails to take reasonable measures to restore the property to the owner;
and
(3) intends to deprive the owner permanently of the use or benefit of the
property when the person obtains the property or at a later time.
(e) A person may not obtain the services of another that are available only for
compensation:
(1) by deception; or
(2) with knowledge that the services are provided without the consent of
the person providing them.
(f) Under this section, an offender’s intention or knowledge that a promise would
not be performed may not be established by or inferred solely from the fact that the promise
was not performed.
(g) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THEFT OF A FIREARM.
(2) A person convicted of theft of property or services with a value of:
(i) at least $1,500 but less than $25,000 is guilty of a felony and:
1. is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 5 years or a fine
not exceeding $10,000 or both; and
2. shall restore the property taken to the owner or pay the
owner the value of the property or services;
(ii) at least $25,000 but less than $100,000 is guilty of a felony and:
1. is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine
not exceeding $15,000 or both; and

SENATE BILL 336
2. shall restore the property taken to the owner or pay the
owner the value of the property or services; or
(iii) $100,000 or more is guilty of a felony and:
1. is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 20 years or a fine
not exceeding $25,000 or both; and
2. shall restore the property taken to the owner or pay the
owner the value of the property or services.
[(2)] (3) Except as provided in paragraph [(3)] (4) of this subsection, a
person convicted of theft of property or services with a value of at least $100 but less than
$1,500, is guilty of a misdemeanor and:
(i) is subject to:
1. for a first conviction, imprisonment not exceeding 6
months or a fine not exceeding $500 or both; and
2. for a second or subsequent conviction, imprisonment not
exceeding 1 year or a fine not exceeding $500 or both; and
(ii) shall restore the property taken to the owner or pay the owner
the value of the property or services.
[(3)] (4) A person convicted of theft of property or services with a value of
less than $100 is guilty of a misdemeanor and:
(i) is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 90 days or a fine not
exceeding $500 or both; and
(ii) shall restore the property taken to the owner or pay the owner
the value of the property or services.
[(4)] (5) Subject to paragraph [(5)] (6) of this subsection, a person who
has four or more prior convictions under this subtitle and who is convicted of theft of
property or services with a value of less than $1,500 under paragraph [(2)] (3) of this
subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and:
(i) is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 5 years or a fine not
exceeding $5,000 or both; and
(ii) shall restore the property taken to the owner or pay the owner
the value of the property or services.

SENATE BILL 336 5
[(5)] (6) The court may not impose the penalties under paragraph [(4)]
(5) of this subsection unless the State’s Attorney serves notice on the defendant or the
defendant’s counsel before the acceptance of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or at least
15 days before trial that:
(i) the State will seek the penalties under paragraph [(4)] (5) of this
subsection; and
(ii) lists the alleged prior convictions.
(H) (1) A PERSON CONVICTED OF THEFT OF A FIREARM, INCLUDING AN
ANTIQUE FIREARM OR A REPLICA OF AN ANTIQUE FIREARM, IS GUILTY OF A FELONY
AND IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) FOR A FIRST CONVICTION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING
5 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 OR BOTH; AND
(II) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT CONVICTION,
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,500 OR
BOTH.
(2) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE SEPARATE FROM AND CONSECUTIVE TO A SENTENCE FOR
ANY OTHER OFFENSE.
[(h)] (I) (1) If a person is convicted of a violation under this section for failure
to pay for motor fuel after the motor fuel was dispensed into a vehicle, the court shall:
(i) notify the person that the person’s driver’s license may be
suspended under § 16–206.1 of the Transportation Article; and
(ii) notify the Motor Vehicle Administration of the violation.
(2) The Chief Judge of the District Court and the Administrative Office of
the Courts, in conjunction with the Motor Vehicle Administration, shall establish uniform
procedures for reporting a violation under this subsection.
[(i)] (J) An action or prosecution for a violation of subsection [(g)(2) or (3)]
(G)(3) OR (4) of this section shall be commenced within 2 years after the commission of
the crime.
[(j)] (K) A person who violates this section by use of an interactive computer
service may be prosecuted, indicted, tried, and convicted in any county in which the victim
resides or the electronic communication originated or terminated.

SENATE BILL 336
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.